Maryland, session 2025, HB0988.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) through (g) of this section, the clerks of
the District Court shall:
(1) Collect costs, fines, forfeitures, or penalties imposed by the court; and
(2) Remit them to the State under a system agreed upon by the Chief Judge
of the District Court and the Comptroller.
(e) (1) (i) A citation issued [pursuant to] UNDER § 21–202.1, § 21–706.1, §
21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation
Article shall provide that the person receiving the citation may elect to stand trial by
notifying the issuing agency of the person’s intention to stand trial at least 5 days [prior
to] BEFORE the date of payment as set forth in the citation.
(ii) On receipt of the notice to stand trial, the agency shall forward
to the District Court having venue a copy of the citation and a copy of the notice from the
person who received the citation indicating the person’s intention to stand trial.
(iii) On receipt thereof, the District Court shall schedule the case for
trial and notify the defendant of the trial date under procedures adopted by the Chief Judge
of the District Court.
(3) (I) [Civil] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, CIVIL penalties resulting from citations issued using a vehicle height
monitoring system, traffic control signal monitoring system, speed monitoring system,
work zone speed control system, stop sign monitoring system, school bus monitoring
camera, bus lane monitoring system, or a noise abatement monitoring system that are
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 587
collected by the District Court shall be collected in accordance with subsection (a) of this
section and distributed in accordance with § 12–118 of the Transportation Article.
(II) CIVIL PENALTIES RESULTING FROM CITATIONS ISSUED
USING A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM CONTROLLED BY THE MARYLAND
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY THAT ARE COLLECTED BY THE DISTRICT COURT
SHALL BE COLLECTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AND
REMITTED TO THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(e) (2) (i) A citation issued as the result of [a vehicle height monitoring
system, a traffic control signal monitoring system, a speed monitoring system, a work zone
speed control system or a stop sign monitoring system controlled by a political subdivision,
a school bus monitoring camera, a bus lane monitoring system, or a noise abatement
monitoring system] ANY OF THE FOLLOWING SYSTEMS OR CAMERAS CONTROLLED BY
A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION shall provide that, in an uncontested case, the penalty shall
be paid directly to that political subdivision:
1. A VEHICLE HEIGHT MONITORING SYSTEM;
2. A TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM;
3. A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM;
4. A WORK ZONE SPEED CONTROL SYSTEM;
5. A STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM;
6. A SCHOOL BUS MONITORING CAMERA;
7. A BUS LANE MONITORING SYSTEM; OR
8. A NOISE ABATEMENT MONITORING SYSTEM.
(ii) A CITATION ISSUED AS THE RESULT OF ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING SYSTEMS OR CAMERAS CONTROLLED BY A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION
SHALL PROVIDE THAT, IN A CONTESTED CASE, THE PENALTY SHALL BE PAID
DIRECTLY TO THE DISTRICT COURT:
– 3 –

Ch. 587 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. A VEHICLE HEIGHT MONITORING SYSTEM;
2. A TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM;
3. A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM;
4. A WORK ZONE SPEED CONTROL SYSTEM;
5. A STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM;
6. A SCHOOL BUS MONITORING CAMERA;
7. A BUS LANE MONITORING SYSTEM; OR
8. A NOISE ABATEMENT MONITORING SYSTEM.
(III) A citation issued as the result of [a traffic control signal
monitoring system or a work zone speed control system controlled by a State agency, or as
a result of a vehicle height monitoring system, a traffic control signal monitoring system, a
speed monitoring system, a stop sign monitoring system, a school bus monitoring camera,
a bus lane monitoring system, or a noise abatement monitoring system in a case contested
in District Court,] ANY OF THE FOLLOWING SYSTEMS OR CAMERAS CONTROLLED BY
A STATE AGENCY shall provide that, IN AN UNCONTESTED OR CONTESTED CASE, the
penalty shall be paid directly to the District Court:
1. A TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM;
2. A WORK ZONE SPEED CONTROL SYSTEM;
3. A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM; OR
4. A BUS LANE MONITORING SYSTEM.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(e) (2) (i) A citation issued as the result of [a vehicle height monitoring
system, a traffic control signal monitoring system, a speed monitoring system, a work zone
speed control system or a stop sign monitoring system controlled by a political subdivision,
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 587
a school bus monitoring camera, or a bus lane monitoring system] ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING SYSTEMS OR CAMERAS CONTROLLED BY A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION shall
provide that, in an uncontested case, the penalty shall be paid directly to that political
subdivision:
1. A VEHICLE HEIGHT MONITORING SYSTEM;
2. A TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM;
3. A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM;
4. A WORK ZONE SPEED CONTROL SYSTEM;
5. A STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM;
6. A SCHOOL BUS MONITORING CAMERA; OR
7. A BUS LANE MONITORING SYSTEM.
(ii) A CITATION ISSUED AS THE RESULT OF ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING SYSTEMS OR CAMERAS CONTROLLED BY A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION
SHALL PROVIDE THAT, IN A CONTESTED CASE, THE PENALTY SHALL BE PAID
DIRECTLY TO THE DISTRICT COURT:
1. A VEHICLE HEIGHT MONITORING SYSTEM;
2. A TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM;
3. A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM;
4. A WORK ZONE SPEED CONTROL SYSTEM;
5. A STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM;
6. A SCHOOL BUS MONITORING CAMERA; OR
7. A BUS LANE MONITORING SYSTEM.
(III) A citation issued as the result of [a traffic control signal
monitoring system or a work zone speed control system controlled by a State agency, or as
a result of a vehicle height monitoring system, a traffic control signal monitoring system, a
speed monitoring system, a stop sign monitoring system, a school bus monitoring camera,
or a bus lane monitoring system in a case contested in District Court,] ANY OF THE
– 5 –

Ch. 587 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
FOLLOWING SYSTEMS OR CAMERAS CONTROLLED BY A STATE AGENCY shall provide
that, IN AN UNCONTESTED OR CONTESTED CASE, the penalty shall be paid directly to
the District Court:
1. A TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM;
2. A WORK ZONE SPEED CONTROL SYSTEM;
3. A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM; OR
4. A BUS LANE MONITORING SYSTEM.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(e) (2) (i) A citation issued as the result of [a vehicle height monitoring
system, a traffic control signal monitoring system, a speed monitoring system, a work zone
speed control system controlled by a political subdivision, a school bus monitoring camera,
or a bus lane monitoring system] ANY OF THE FOLLOWING SYSTEMS OR CAMERAS
CONTROLLED BY A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION shall provide that, in an uncontested case,
the penalty shall be paid directly to that political subdivision:
1. A VEHICLE HEIGHT MONITORING SYSTEM;
2. A TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM;
3. A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM;
4. A WORK ZONE SPEED CONTROL SYSTEM;
5. A SCHOOL BUS MONITORING CAMERA; OR
6. A BUS LANE MONITORING SYSTEM.
(ii) A CITATION ISSUED AS THE RESULT OF ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING SYSTEMS OR CAMERAS CONTROLLED BY A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION
SHALL PROVIDE THAT, IN A CONTESTED CASE, THE PENALTY SHALL BE PAID
DIRECTLY TO THE DISTRICT COURT:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 587
1. A VEHICLE HEIGHT MONITORING SYSTEM;
2. A TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM;
3. A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM;
4. A WORK ZONE SPEED CONTROL SYSTEM;
5. A SCHOOL BUS MONITORING CAMERA; OR
6. A BUS LANE MONITORING SYSTEM.
(III) A citation issued as the result of [a traffic control signal
monitoring system or a work zone speed control system controlled by a State agency, or as
a result of a vehicle height monitoring system, a traffic control signal monitoring system, a
speed monitoring system, a school bus monitoring camera, or a bus lane monitoring system
in a case contested in District Court,] ANY OF THE FOLLOWING SYSTEMS OR CAMERAS
CONTROLLED BY A STATE AGENCY shall provide that, IN AN UNCONTESTED OR
CONTESTED CASE, the penalty shall be paid directly to the District Court:
1. A TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM;
2. A WORK ZONE SPEED CONTROL SYSTEM;
3. A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM; OR
4. A BUS LANE MONITORING SYSTEM.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Agency” means:
(i) A law enforcement agency of a local political subdivision that is
authorized to issue a citation for a violation of the Maryland Vehicle Law or of local traffic
laws or regulations; [or]
(ii) For a municipal corporation that does not maintain a police force,
– 7 –

Ch. 587 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
an agency established or designated by the municipal corporation to implement this
subtitle using speed monitoring systems in accordance with this section; OR
(III) FOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS PLACED AND USED ON
MARYLAND ROUTE 200 (INTERCOUNTY CONNECTOR), THE MARYLAND
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY.
(5) “Program administrator” means an employee or a representative of the
local jurisdiction OR THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY designated by the
local jurisdiction OR THE AUTHORITY to oversee a contract with a speed monitoring
system contractor.
(8) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
(b) (1) (i) 1. A speed monitoring system may not be used [in] BY a local
jurisdiction under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local
jurisdiction by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
2. THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY MAY
USE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS ON MARYLAND ROUTE 200 (INTERCOUNTY
CONNECTOR) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(vi) This section applies to a violation of this subtitle recorded by a
speed monitoring system that meets the requirements of this subsection and has been
placed:
1. In Anne Arundel County, Montgomery County, or Prince
George’s County, on a highway in a residential district, as defined in § 21–101 of this title,
with a maximum posted speed limit of 35 miles per hour, which speed limit was established
using generally accepted traffic engineering practices;
2. In a school zone with a posted speed limit of at least 20
miles per hour;
3. In Prince George’s County:
A. Subject to subparagraph (vii)1 of this paragraph, on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway); or
B. On that part of a highway located within the grounds of
an institution of higher education as defined in § 10–101(h) of the Education Article, or
within one–half mile of the grounds of a building or property used by the institution of
higher education where generally accepted traffic and engineering practices indicate that
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 587
motor vehicle, pedestrian, or bicycle traffic is substantially generated or influenced by the
institution of higher education;
4. Subject to subparagraph (vii)2 of this paragraph, on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City;
5. In Anne Arundel County, on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup
Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel
County–Howard County line; [or]
6. Subject to subparagraph (vii)3 of this paragraph, at the
intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County;
OR
7. BY THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY
ON MARYLAND ROUTE 200 (INTERCOUNTY CONNECTOR) IN MONTGOMERY
COUNTY.
(vii) 1. Not more than six mobile or stationary speed monitoring
systems may be placed on Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway).
2. Not more than two speed monitoring systems may be
placed on Interstate 83 in Baltimore City.
3. Not more than one speed monitoring system may be placed
at the intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot
County.
(viii) Before activating a speed monitoring system, the local
jurisdiction OR THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY, AS APPROPRIATE,
shall:
1. Publish notice of the location of the speed monitoring
system on its website and in a newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction;
2. Ensure that each sign that designates a school zone is
proximate to a sign that:
A. Indicates that speed monitoring systems are in use in the
school zone; and
B. Is in accordance with the manual for and the specifications
for a uniform system of traffic control devices adopted by the State Highway Administration
under § 25–104 of this article;
3. With regard to a speed monitoring system established on
– 9 –

Ch. 587 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway) in Prince George’s County, based on proximity
to an institution of higher education under subparagraph (vi)3 of this paragraph, on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City, in Anne Arundel County on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup
Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel
County–Howard County line, [or] at the intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road)
and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County, OR ON MARYLAND ROUTE 200 (INTERCOUNTY
CONNECTOR) IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY, ensure that all speed limit signs approaching
and within the segment of highway on which the speed monitoring system is located include
signs that:
A. Are in accordance with the manual and specifications for
a uniform system of traffic control devices adopted by the State Highway Administration
under § 25–104 of this article; and
B. Indicate that a speed monitoring system is in use; and
4. With regard to a speed monitoring system placed on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway) in Prince George’s County, Interstate 83 in
Baltimore City, in Anne Arundel County on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup Road) between
the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel County–Howard County
line, [or] at the intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in
Talbot County, OR ON MARYLAND ROUTE 200 (INTERCOUNTY CONNECTOR) IN
MONTGOMERY COUNTY, ensure that each sign that indicates that a speed monitoring
system is in use is proximate to a device that displays a real–time posting of the speed at
which a driver is traveling.
(x) 1. A local jurisdiction that authorizes a program of speed
monitoring systems OR THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY, AS
APPROPRIATE, shall designate an official or employee to investigate and respond to
questions or concerns about the local jurisdiction’s OR THE AUTHORITY’S speed
monitoring system program.
2. A. The [local] designee shall review a citation
generated by a speed monitoring system if the person who received the citation requests
review before the deadline for contesting liability under this section.
B. If the [local] designee determines that the citation is an
erroneous violation, the [local] designee shall void the citation.
C. If the [local] designee determines that a person did not
receive notice of a citation issued under this section due to an administrative error, the
[local] designee may resend the citation in accordance with subsection (d) of this section or
void the citation.
D. A [local] designee that takes any action described under
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 587
subsubsubparagraph C of this subsubparagraph shall notify the Administration of the
action for the purpose of rescinding any administrative penalties imposed under subsection
(g) of this section.
E. A [local] designee may not determine that a citation is an
erroneous violation based solely on the dismissal of the citation by a court.
3. A [local] designee may not be employed by a speed
monitoring system contractor or have been involved in any review of a speed monitoring
system citation, other than review of a citation under this subparagraph.
4. On receipt of a written question or concern from a person,
the [local] designee shall provide a written answer or response to the person within a
reasonable time.
5. A local jurisdiction AND THE MARYLAND
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY shall make any written questions or concerns received
under this subparagraph and any subsequent written answers or responses available for
public inspection.
(4) (i) A speed monitoring system shall undergo an annual calibration
check performed by an independent calibration laboratory that is:
1. Selected by the local jurisdiction OR THE MARYLAND
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY, AS APPROPRIATE; and
2. Unaffiliated with the manufacturer of the speed
monitoring system.
(5) If a local jurisdiction OR THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION
AUTHORITY authorizes a program of speed monitoring systems under this section:
(i) The local jurisdiction OR THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION
AUTHORITY shall designate a program administrator who may not be an employee or
representative of the speed monitoring system contractor; and
(ii) The contract with the speed monitoring system contractor shall
include the following provisions:
1. For potential violations submitted by a contractor for
review by an agency, if more than 5% of the violations in a calendar year are erroneous
violations, then the contractor shall be subject to liquidated damages for each erroneous
violation equal to at least 50% of the fine amount for the erroneous violation, plus any
reimbursements paid by the local jurisdiction OR THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION
AUTHORITY; and
– 11 –

Ch. 587 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. The local jurisdiction OR THE MARYLAND
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY may cancel a contract with a contractor if the contractor
violates the contract by submitting erroneous violations to the agency that exceed a
threshold specified in the contract or violates the law in implementing the contract.
(6) (i) The Maryland Police Training and Standards Commission, in
consultation with the State Highway Administration and other interested stakeholders,
shall develop a training program concerning the oversight and administration of a speed
monitoring program by a local jurisdiction AND THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION
AUTHORITY, including a curriculum of best practices in the State.
(ii) 1. A program administrator shall participate in the training
program established under this paragraph before a local jurisdiction OR THE MARYLAND
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY initially implements a new speed monitoring program
and subsequently at least once every 2 years.
2. A program administrator for a program in existence on
June 1, 2014, shall initially participate in the training program on or before December 31,
2014, and subsequently at least once every 2 years.
3. If a local jurisdiction OR THE MARYLAND
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY designates a new program administrator, the new
program administrator shall participate in the next available training program.
(c) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (f)(4) of this
section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if the motor vehicle is
recorded by a speed monitoring system while being operated in violation of this subtitle.
(2) A civil penalty under this subsection may not exceed $40.
(3) For purposes of this section, the District Court shall prescribe:
(i) A uniform citation form consistent with subsection (d)(1) of this
section and § 7–302 of the Courts Article; and
(ii) A civil penalty, which shall be indicated on the citation, to be paid
by persons who choose to prepay the civil penalty without appearing in District Court.
(d) (5) A person who receives a citation under paragraph (1) of this subsection
may:
(i) Pay the civil penalty, in accordance with instructions on the
citation, directly to the political subdivision OR THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 587
AUTHORITY, AS APPROPRIATE; or
(ii) Elect to stand trial in the District Court for the alleged violation.
(i) In consultation with the appropriate local government agencies AND THE
MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY, the Chief Judge of the District Court shall
adopt procedures for the issuance of citations, the trial of civil violations, and the collection
of civil penalties under this section.
(j) (2) If a contractor in any manner operates a speed monitoring system or
administers or processes citations generated by a speed monitoring system on behalf of a
local jurisdiction OR THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY, the contractor’s
fee may not be contingent on a per–ticket basis on the number of citations issued or paid.
(k) (1) On or before December 31 of each year, the Maryland Police Training
and Standards Commission shall:
(i) Compile and make publicly available a report for the previous
fiscal year on each speed monitoring system program operated by a local jurisdiction AND
THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY under this section; and
(ii) Submit the report to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
(2) The report shall include:
(i) The total number of citations issued;
(ii) The number of citations issued and the number voided as
erroneous violations for each camera;
(iii) The gross revenue generated by the program;
(iv) The expenditures incurred by the program;
(v) The net revenue generated by the program;
(vi) The total amount of any payments made to a contractor under
the program;
(vii) A description of how the net revenue generated by the program
was used;
(viii) The number of employees of the local jurisdiction OR THE
MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY involved in the program;
– 13 –

Ch. 587 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ix) The type of speed monitoring system used by the local
jurisdiction OR THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY;
(x) The locations at which each speed monitoring system was used
in the local jurisdiction OR ON MARYLAND ROUTE 200 (INTERCOUNTY CONNECTOR);
(xi) The activation start and stop dates of each speed monitoring
system for each location at which it was used; and
(xii) The number of citations issued by each speed monitoring system
at each location.
(3) Each local jurisdiction with a speed monitoring system program AND
THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY shall submit the information required
under paragraph (2) of this subsection to the Commission by October 31 of each year and
assist the Commission in the preparation of the annual report.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the State Highway
Administration shall provide the Maryland Transportation Authority with access to the
State Highway Administration’s existing speed monitoring systems and vendor contacts to
assist the Maryland Transportation Authority in the planning and implementing of the use
of speed monitoring systems under this Act.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 3 of this Act shall take
effect on the taking effect of the termination provision specified in Section 3 of Chapters
624 and 625 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2024. If that termination provision takes
effect, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall
be abrogated and of no further force and effect. This Act may not be interpreted to have any
effect on that termination provision.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 4 of this Act shall take
effect on the taking effect of the termination provision specified in Section 3 of Chapter 678
of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2024, contingent on the taking effect of the
termination provisions specified in Section 3 of Chapters 624 and 625 of the Acts of the
General Assembly of 2024. If all the termination provisions take effect, Section 3 of this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect. This Act may not be interpreted to have any effect on these
termination provisions.
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to the provisions of
Sections 7 and 8 of this Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 14 –